Utah statutes.
77-2-5.   Diversion agreement -- Negotiation -- Contents.
(1) At any time after the filing of an information or indictment and prior to
conviction, the prosecuting attorney may, by written agreement with the
defendant, filed with the court, and upon approval of the court, divert a
defendant to a non-criminal diversion program.
(2)  A defendant shall be represented by counsel during negotiations for
diversion and at the time of execution of any diversion agreement unless he
shall have knowingly and intelligently waived his right to counsel.
(3)  The defendant has the right to be represented by counsel at any court
hearing relating to a diversion program.
(4)  Any diversion agreement entered into between the prosecution and the
defense and approved by a magistrate shall contain a full, detailed statement
of the requirements agreed to by the defendant and the reasons for diversion.
A decision by a prosecuting attorney not to divert a defendant is not subject
to judicial review.
(5)  Diversion programs longer than two years shall not be permitted.
(6)  A diversion agreement shall not be approved unless the defendant, before
a magistrate and in the agreement, knowingly and intelligently waives his
constitutional right to a speedy trial.
